src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-bechdub_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - bəčdxʷ: # Verb pg 207 'eng knock sm down' - partial paradigm
# Perfect aspect
     bəčdxʷ+V+TV+Asp/Prf+ScCon+OcSg1: ʔubəčdubš # knocked me down
     bəčdxʷ+V+TV+Asp/Prf+ScCon+OcSg2: ʔubəčdubicid # knocked you Sg down
     bəčdxʷ+V+TV+Asp/Prf+ScCon+OcSP3: ʔubəčdxʷ # knocked him/her/it/them down
     bəčdxʷ+V+TV+Asp/Prf+ScCon+OcPl1: ʔubəčdubuɬ # knocked us down
     bəčdxʷ+V+TV+Asp/Prf+ScCon+OcPl2: ʔubəčdubuɬəd # knocked you (guys) down
     bəčdxʷ+V+TV+Asp/Prf+Mid: ʔubəčdub # knocked him/her/it/them down
